Georgia, session 2025_26, SB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to minimum wage,
is amended by revising Code Section 34-4-3, relating to amount of minimum wage to be paid
by employers, as follows:
"34-4-3.
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, every employer, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, shall pay to all covered employees a minimum wage which
S. B. 273
- 1 -

LC 46 1019
shall be not less than $5.15 $22.00 per hour for each hour worked in the employment of
such employer.
(2)(A) On January 1, 2026, and on January 1 of each successive year thereafter, the
minimum wage shall be adjusted upward to reflect the increase in the cost of living, if
any, as determined by the Georgia Department of Labor pursuant to subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph.
(B) On September 30, 2025, and on September 30 of each year thereafter, the Georgia
Department of Labor shall measure any change or note the lack of change in the cost
of living from the preceding July over July of the immediately preceding year. In
making such determination, the Georgia Department of Labor may utilize the
Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers or such successor
index as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department
of Labor or its successor agency.
(C) Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph shall be published and shall take effect on the following January 1 of each
successive year.
(b) Employers of employees who meet the eligibility requirements for the tip credit under
the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Section 203(t), may
credit tips toward the satisfaction of up to 50 percent of the minimum wage provided by
this Code section.
(b)(c) This chapter shall not apply with respect to:
(1) Any employer that has sales of $40,000.00 $50,000.00 per year or less;
(2) Any employer having five employees or less;
(3) Any employer of domestic employees;
(4) Any employer who is a farm owner, sharecropper, or land renter;
(5) Any employee whose compensation consists wholly or partially of gratuities;
(6)(3) Any employee who is a high school or college student;
S. B. 273
- 2 -

LC 46 1019
(7)(4) Any individual who is employed as a newspaper carrier; or
(8)(5) Any individual who is employed by a nonprofit child-caring institution or
long-term care facility serving children or mentally disabled adults who are enrolled in
such institution and reside in residential facilities of the institution, if such employee
resides in such facilities, receives without cost board and lodging from such institution,
and is compensated on a cash basis at an annual rate of not less
than $10,000.00 $15,000.00.
(c)(d) This chapter shall not apply to any employer who is subject to the minimum wage
provisions of any act of Congress as to employees covered thereby if such act of Congress
provides for a minimum wage which is greater than the minimum wage which is provided
for in this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 273
- 3 -